Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 16. Transition Provisions.

§ 13.1-937.
Application to existing corporations.

Unless otherwise provided, the provisions of this chapter shall apply to all domestic and foreign corporations existing at the time this chapter takes effect and their members. The charter of every corporation heretofore or hereafter organized in this Commonwealth shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter. In the case of foreign corporations, the certificate of authority to transact business in this Commonwealth issued by the Commission under any prior act of this Commonwealth shall continue in effect subject to the provisions hereof.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-203, 13.1-290, 13.1-290.1; 1956, c. 428; 1966, c. 387; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-938.
Application to certain social, patriotic and benevolent societies incorporated before year 1900; reports by such societies.

The charter of every social, patriotic and benevolent society incorporated by an act of the General Assembly of Virginia prior to the year 1900 for the purpose of perpetuating the memory of men in the military, naval and civil service of the Colonies and of the Continental Congress shall be deemed to have remained, and to be, in full force and effect notwithstanding the provisions of §

13.1-937

or any other statute enacted after January 1, 1950, or regulation pursuant thereto requiring the filing of any report or reports with the Commission. All such reports which under such statutes should have been so filed shall be filed with the Commission on or before August 1, 1986. Such corporation hereafter shall be deemed to hold its charter subject to the provisions of the Constitution of Virginia now in effect, and the laws passed in pursuance thereof.

History.

1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-939.
Saving provision.

Except as provided in subsection B, the repeal of a statute by this Act does not affect:

The operation of the statute or any action taken under it before its repeal;

Any ratification, right, remedy, privilege, obligation or liability acquired, accrued, or incurred under the statute before its repeal;

Any violation of the statute, or any penalty, forfeiture or punishment incurred because of the violation, before its repeal; or

Any proceeding commenced, or reorganization or dissolution authorized by the board of directors, under the statute before its repeal, and the proceeding, reorganization or dissolution may be completed in accordance with the statute as if it had not been repealed.

If a penalty or punishment imposed for violation of a statute repealed by this Act is reduced by this Act, the penalty or punishment if not already imposed shall be imposed in accordance with this Act.

If any provision of this chapter is deemed to modify, limit, or supersede the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq., the provisions of this chapter shall control to the maximum extent permitted by 15 U.S.C. § 7002(a)(2).

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-292; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925; 2010, c. 171.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 deleted “of this section” following “subsection B” in the introductory paragraph of subsection A; and added “or” at the end of subdivision A 3.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 171 added subsection C.

§ 13.1-940.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 709, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-940

, pertaining to severability, derived from 1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-941.
Repealed by Acts 2002, c. 607.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-941

, relating to conversion to a stock corporation, was enacted by Acts 1989, c. 609.